West Virginia, session 2026, SB325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Architects. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-12-1 of this code, modified by the Board of Architects to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 8, 2025, relating to the Board of Architects (registration of architects, 2 CSR 01), is authorized.